Illinois, session 104th, HB1016.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Public Aid Code is amended by 5adding Section 5-5.01c as follows: 6    (305 ILCS 5/5-5.01c new)7    Sec. 5-5.01c. Seniors Deserve Dignity Program; 8supplemental personal needs payments. Subject to 9appropriation, the Department shall establish and administer a 10Seniors Deserve Dignity Program that provides monthly 11supplemental personal needs payments to persons residing in 12supportive living facilities authorized under Section 5-5.01a 13who receive medical assistance under this Article and a 14personal needs allowance as specified in 89 Ill. Adm. Code 15146.225(c). Beginning July 1, 2025 through June 30, 2026, a 16qualifying person shall receive a monthly supplemental 17personal needs payment in the amount of $30 so that the 18person's total monthly personal needs allowance is no less 19than $120. Beginning July 1, 2026 through June 30, 2027, a 20qualifying person shall receive a monthly supplemental 21personal needs payment in the amount of $60 so that the 22person's total monthly personal needs allowance is no less 23than $150. Beginning July 1, 2027 and every July 1 thereafter,   HB1016- 2 -LRB104 03157 KTG 13178 b1a qualifying person's monthly supplemental personal needs 2payment amount shall be adjusted for inflation to reflect any 3percentage increase in the Consumer Price Index-U during the 4preceding 12-month calendar year. The monthly supplemental 5personal needs payments provided under the program shall not 6be considered income for purposes of determining eligibility 7or the amount of assistance for any public aid benefit 8provided under State law. The Department may adopt any rules 9necessary to implement the program.10    As used in this Section, "Consumer Price Index-U" means 11the index published by the Bureau of Labor Statistics of the 12United States Department of Labor that measures the average 13change in prices of goods and services purchased by all urban 14consumers, United States city average, all items, 1982-84 = 15100.  16    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect July 1, 172025.